Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4552.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 13, article 5, section 11, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Expiration. The authority to approve a tax increment financing plan to establish a tax increment financing district under this section expires December 31, deleted text begin 2026deleted text end new text begin 2028new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Eden Prairie and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end